Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.160

Leaves of absence.

Leave of absence, without pay, may be granted by any appointing power to any person under civil service: PROVIDED, That such appointing power gives notice of the leave to the commission. All temporary employment caused by leaves of absence shall be made from the eligible list of the classified civil service.

[ 1959 c 1 s 16 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]